Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21.4 Performance-Enhancing Dietary Supplements and High School Athletes

16-21.4-1.
Performance-enhancing dietary supplements.

For the purposes of this chapter “performance-enhancing dietary supplement” means a dietary supplement designed or marketed to improve athletic performance or physical development by promoting body or muscle growth, stimulating or altering the cardiovascular system or the central nervous system, altering the perception of pain, or otherwise enhancing athletic performance or physical development above levels that would be anticipated under normal conditions with appropriate nourishment;

“Performance-enhancing dietary supplement” does not include a dietary supplement in which the only ingredients consist of one or more of the following:

Vitamins or minerals.

Authorized food additives, color additives, ingredients authorized by prior sanction, or those classified as generally recognized as safe for use in foods as defined in the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), and accompanying federal regulations, except for caffeine in excess of 200 milligrams per serving, if these ingredients are used in a dietary supplement at the levels, and for the purposes, for which they may be used in foods.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 246, § 1.

16-21.4-2.
Sponsorship by or promotion of performance-enhancing dietary supplement prohibited.

No teacher, athletic director, sports coach, or other school official or employee may knowingly sell or distribute to students or knowingly promote the use by students of any performance-enhancing dietary supplement.

No high school or public or private university or college may accept any sponsorship or other payment from a performance-enhancing dietary supplement manufacturer to promote such manufacturer’s performance-enhancing dietary supplement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 246, § 1.

16-21.4-3.
Development of list of performance-enhancing dietary supplements.

The director of the department of health, in consultation with the commissioner of the state department of elementary and secondary education shall develop a list of performance-enhancing dietary supplements for the purposes of this chapter. The list shall be developed on or before January 1, 2007, and may be amended by the director of the department of health at any time. The director of the department of health shall submit the list to the director of the department of elementary and secondary education on or before January 1, 2007. Upon receipt of this list, the department of elementary and secondary education shall notify each school district that contains grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that this list has been completed and shall post the list on its website. Any amendments to this list shall be submitted to the department of elementary and secondary education no later than December 31 of the year in which the amendments are made. Upon receipt of amendments to this list, the department of elementary and secondary education shall annually notify each school district that contains grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that this list has been amended and shall post the amended list on its website.

In developing this list, the director of the department of health shall refer to the existing lists of prohibited substances used by collegiate, professional, or Olympic sports organizations and shall develop the list so that it is appropriate to interscholastic sports.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 246, § 1.

16-21.4-4.
Education of coaches relating to performance-enhancing dietary supplements.

Effective September 1, 2006, each mandatory first aid course for athletic coaches required pursuant to §

16-11-1

shall include health information relating to performance-enhancing dietary supplements consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

For the purposes of this section, “high school sports coach” means an employee or a volunteer who is authorized by a high school to be responsible for leading a school sports team of pupil athletes.

Upon completion of this program, a high school sports coach shall be deemed to have completed the education requirement relating to this chapter for the remainder of his or her time coaching at the high school level in any school district in the state.

If an existing coach is unavailable to lead his or her team, a substitute coach who does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) may be used for no longer than one season of interscholastic competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 246, § 1.